Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2688.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 5 of the General Laws entitled "BUSINESSES AND PROFESSIONS"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 37.9
PATIENT PAYMENT INFORMATION
5-37.9-1. Patient payment information -- Requiring electronic payment information
prohibited.
(a) No healthcare provider, as defined in § 5-37.3-12, shall require a patient to provide bank
account information, a credit card number, a debit card number or any other form of electronic
payment to be kept on file with the healthcare provider as a prerequisite to seeing the patient for an
office visit or providing any healthcare service to the patient.
(b) A violation of subsection (a) of this section shall be considered an unfair trade practice
pursuant to chapter 13.1 of title 6 ("deceptive trade practices").
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(1) Affect a patient's obligation to pay for healthcare services; or
(2) Prohibit a healthcare provider from requesting, collecting or storing bank, credit or
debit card or other payment-related information if the patient agrees to provide such information.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005448
========
LC005448 - Page 2 of 3